Idaho, session 2026, H0549.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-1325A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1325A. PETITIONS FOR DISSOLUTION OF HOSPITAL DISTRICTS. (1) Pro-
ceedings for the dissolution of a hospital district may be initiated by a pe-
tition containing the signatures of qualified electors of the district or
owners of property within the district equal in number to ten percent (10%)
of the qualified electors and taxpayers of the district, the same percentage
required for the organization of the district, but not no earlier than four
(4) years after the date of its establishment.
(2) The petition, when completed and verified, shall be filed with the
clerk of the court of the county or counties if more than one (1) county is in-
volved. The county clerk shall publish notice and the county commissioners
shall hold a hearing on the matter. If necessary, they shall hold an elec-
tion, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, on the matter.
The hearing and election shall be held in accordance with the terms and pro-
visions of title 34, Idaho Code. The disposition of hospital district assets
on dissolution and the provision for payment of district indebtedness shall
be made in accordance with the provisions of sections 63-4105 and 63-4106,
Idaho Code.
(3) If the hospital district embraces territory in more than one (1)
county, an election for its dissolution shall be deemed approved only if a
majority of the votes cast in each such county were cast in the affirmative.
If, upon the canvass of ballots, it be determined that the proposition has
been approved, the board of county commissioners of each county shall en-
ter its order to that effect, subject to the provisions of section 39-1325C,
Idaho Code, and the order shall by them be made a matter of record.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.